Nebraska, session 109, LB391A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the Give to Enable
Support Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1,000,000 from the Give to Enable
Support Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the State Treasurer, for Program 475, to aid
in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 391, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $98,687 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 391, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-